Colorado, session 2026A, HB1212.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-105, amend
(2)(c) and (2)(f); and add (2)(g) and (3) as follows:
18-12-105. Unlawfully carrying a concealed weapon - unlawful
possession of weapons - concealed carry of a handgun without a
permit.
(2) It is not an offense pursuant to this section if the defendant
was:
(c) A person who, at the time of carrying a concealed weapon,
held a valid written permit to carry a concealed weapon issued pursuant
to section 18-12-105.1, as it existed prior to its repeal, or, if the weapon
involved was a handgun, held a valid permit to carry a concealed handgun
or a temporary emergency permit issued pursuant to part 2 of this article
ARTICLE 12; except that it shall be IS an offense under PURSUANT TO this
section if the person was carrying a concealed handgun in violation of the
provisions of section 18-12-214; or
(f) A United States probation officer or a United States pretrial
-2- HB26-1212

services officer while on duty and serving in the state of Colorado under
the authority of rules and regulations promulgated by the judicial
conference of the United States; OR
(g) LAWFULLY CARRYING A CONCEALED HANDGUN PURSUANT TO
THE AUTHORITY GRANTED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (a) A PERSON WHO IS AT LEAST EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD AND IS
PERMITTED TO POSSESS A HANDGUN PURSUANT TO FEDERAL AND STATE
LAW HAS THE SAME AUTHORITY TO CARRY A CONCEALED HANDGUN, AND
IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME LIMITATIONS, AS A PERSON WHO HOLDS A PERMIT
TO CARRY A CONCEALED HANDGUN, AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 18-12-214.
(b) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION (3) PROHIBITS A PERSON FROM
APPLYING FOR AND OBTAINING A PERMIT TO CARRY A CONCEALED
HANDGUN PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF THIS ARTICLE 12 FOR THE PURPOSE OF
USING THE PERMIT TO CARRY A CONCEALED HANDGUN IN A STATE THAT
RECOGNIZES THE VALIDITY OF A PERMIT ISSUED IN COLORADO.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-105.3, amend
(2)(e) and (4)(a) as follows:
18-12-105.3. Unlawful carrying of a firearm in government
buildings - penalty - definitions - repeal.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(e) A person who holds a valid permit to carry a concealed
handgun or a temporary emergency permit issued pursuant to part 2 of
this article 12 OR WHO IS LAWFULLY CARRYING A CONCEALED HANDGUN
PURSUANT TO THE AUTHORITY GRANTED IN SECTION 18-12-105 (3), AND
who is carrying a concealed handgun in the adjacent parking area of a
location listed in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) (a) This section does not prohibit a local government from
-3- HB26-1212

enacting an ordinance, regulation, or other law pursuant to section
18-12-214 or 29-11.7-104 that prohibits a person from carrying a firearm
OTHER THAN A HANDGUN in a specified place.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-105.5, amend
(3) introductory portion and (3)(d.5) introductory portion as follows:
18-12-105.5. Unlawfully carrying a weapon - unlawful
possession of weapons - school, college, or university grounds -
definition.
(3) It is not an offense under PURSUANT TO this section if:
(d.5) The weapon involved was a handgun, the person held a valid
permit to carry a concealed handgun or a temporary emergency permit
issued pursuant to part 2 of this article 12 OR THE PERSON IS LAWFULLY
CARRYING A CONCEALED HANDGUN PURSUANT TO THE AUTHORITY
GRANTED IN SECTION 18-12-105 (3), and the person is carrying the
concealed handgun:
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-106, amend
(1)(d) as follows:
18-12-106. Prohibited use of weapons - definitions.
(1) A person commits a class 1 misdemeanor if:
(d) The person has in his or her possession POSSESSES a firearm
while the person is under the influence of intoxicating liquor or of a
controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5). Possession of
a permit issued under PURSUANT TO section 18-12-105.1, as it existed
prior to its repeal, or possession of a permit or a temporary emergency
permit issued pursuant to part 2 of this article ARTICLE 12 is no NOT A
defense to a violation of this subsection (1).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-201, amend
-4- HB26-1212

(1)(c), (2)(a), and (2)(b); and repeal (1)(d) and (2)(c) as follows:
18-12-201. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds that:
(c) Inconsistency regarding issuance of permits results in the
arbitrary and capricious denial of permits to carry concealed handguns
based on the jurisdiction of residence rather than the qualifications for
obtaining a permit; AND
(d) Officials of local governments are uniquely equipped to make
determinations as to where concealed handguns can be carried in their
local jurisdictions; and
(2) Based on the findings specified in subsection (1) of this
section, the general assembly concludes that:
(a) The criteria and procedures for issuing permits to carry
concealed handguns is a matter of statewide concern; AND
(b) It is necessary to provide statewide uniform standards for
issuing permits to carry concealed handguns for self-defense. and
(c) Whether concealed handguns can be carried in a specific area
is a matter of state and local concern.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-202, amend
(6) as follows:
18-12-202. Definitions - repeal.
As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6) "Permit" means a permit to carry a concealed handgun issued
pursuant to the provisions of this part 2. except that "permit" does not
include a temporary emergency permit issued pursuant to section
18-12-209.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-202.5, amend
-5- HB26-1212

(4)(c) and (5) as follows:
18-12-202.5. Concealed handgun training class - refresher
class - rules.
(4) (c) A training certificate issued for the completion of a
refresher class is valid for renewal of a permit to carry a concealed
handgun pursuant to section 18-12-211, but is not valid for an initial
application for a permit to carry a concealed handgun pursuant to section
18-12-203 (1)(h)(VI).
(5) A verified instructor shall provide a training certificate that
includes the printed name and original signature of the class instructor to
any student who completes a concealed handgun training class or a
refresher class so that the student may submit the certificate to a sheriff
as part of an initial application for or an application for renewal of, a
permit to carry a concealed handgun. The training certificate must clearly
indicate whether THAT the student completed a concealed handgun
training class or AND NOT a refresher class.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-202.7, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
18-12-202.7. Concealed handgun training class - instructor
verification.
(2) To become a verified instructor, an applicant must:
(a) Hold a valid permit to carry a concealed handgun issued
pursuant this part 2; that is not a temporary emergency permit issued
pursuant to section 18-12-209; and
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-203, amend
(1) introductory portion, (1)(b), and (3)(a) as follows:
18-12-203. Criteria for obtaining a permit.
-6- HB26-1212

(1) Beginning May 17, 2003, Except as set forth in this section,
a sheriff shall issue a permit to carry a concealed handgun to an applicant
who:
(b) Is twenty-one EIGHTEEN years of age OLD or older;
(3) (a) The sheriff shall deny OR revoke or refuse to renew a
permit if an applicant or a permittee fails to meet one of the criteria listed
in subsection (1) of this section and may deny OR revoke or refuse to
renew a permit on the grounds specified in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-204, amend
(1)(b) and (3)(a) introductory portion; repeal (2)(b); and add (1)(c) as
follows:
18-12-204. Permit contents - validity - carrying requirements.
(1) (b) A permit is valid for a period of five years after the date of
issuance and may be renewed as provided in section 18-12-211 THE LIFE
OF THE PERMIT HOLDER UNLESS SUSPENDED OR REVOKED. A permit issued
pursuant to this part 2 including a temporary emergency permit issued
pursuant to section 18-12-209, is effective in all areas of the state, except
as otherwise provided in section 18-12-214.
(c) A PERMIT, OTHER THAN A TEMPORARY EMERGENCY PERMIT,
ISSUED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 2 PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(c) THAT IS VALID ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(c) DOES NOT EXPIRE AND IS VALID FOR THE LIFE OF THE
PERMIT HOLDER UNLESS SUSPENDED OR REVOKED. THE ISSUING SHERIFF
SHALL ISSUE A PERMITTEE A REPLACEMENT PERMIT WITHOUT AN
EXPIRATION DATE UPON REQUEST OF THE PERMITTEE AND RECEIPT OF A
FIFTEEN DOLLAR FEE.
(2) (b) The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) apply
-7- HB26-1212

to temporary emergency permits issued pursuant to section 18-12-209.
(3) (a) A person who may lawfully possess a handgun may carry
a handgun under the following circumstances without obtaining a permit
and the handgun shall not be IS NOT considered concealed:
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-205, amend
(5) as follows:
18-12-205. Sheriff - application - procedure - background
check.
(5) The sheriff in each county or city and county in the state shall
establish the amount of the new and renewal permit fees FEE within his
or her THE SHERIFF'S jurisdiction. The amount of the new and renewal
permit fees shall FEE MUST comply with the limits specified in paragraph
(b) of subsection (2) SUBSECTION (2)(b) of this section and section
18-12-211 (1), respectively. The fee amounts shall AND MUST reflect the
actual direct and indirect costs to the sheriff of processing permit
applications and renewal applications pursuant to this part 2.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-207, amend
(1) as follows:
18-12-207. Judicial review - permit denial - permit suspension
- permit revocation.
(1) If a sheriff denies a permit application refuses to renew a
permit, or suspends or revokes a permit, the applicant or permittee may
seek judicial review of the sheriff's decision. The applicant or permittee
may seek judicial review either in lieu of or subsequent to the sheriff's
second review.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-208, amend
(1) and (2)(a) as follows:
-8- HB26-1212

18-12-208. Colorado bureau of investigation - duties.
(1) Upon receipt of a permit applicant's fingerprints from a sheriff
SUBMITTED pursuant to section 18-12-205 (4), or upon a sheriff's request
pursuant to section 18-12-211 (1), the bureau shall process the full set of
fingerprints to obtain any available state criminal justice information or
federal information pursuant to section 16-21-103 (5) C.R.S., and shall
report any information received to the sheriff. In addition, within ten days
after receiving the fingerprints, the bureau shall forward one set of the
fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for processing to obtain
any available state criminal justice information or federal information.
(2) The bureau shall use the fingerprints received pursuant to this
part 2 solely for the purposes of:
(a) Obtaining information for the issuance or renewal of permits;
and
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-12-209
as follows:
18-12-209. Issuance by sheriffs of temporary emergency
permits.
(1) Notwithstanding any provisions of this part 2 to the contrary,
a sheriff, as provided in this section, may issue a temporary emergency
permit to carry a concealed handgun to a person whom the sheriff has
reason to believe may be in immediate danger.
(2) (a) To receive a temporary emergency permit, a person shall
submit to the sheriff of the county or city and county in which the person
resides or in which the circumstances giving rise to the emergency exist
the items specified in section 18-12-205; except that an applicant for a
temporary emergency permit need not submit documentary evidence
-9- HB26-1212

demonstrating competence with a handgun as required under section
18-12-205 (3)(a), and the applicant shall submit a temporary permit fee
not to exceed twenty-five dollars, as set by the sheriff. Upon receipt of the
documents and fee, the sheriff shall request that the bureau conduct a
criminal history record check of the bureau files and a search of the
national instant criminal background check system. The sheriff may issue
a temporary emergency permit to the applicant if the sheriff determines
the person may be in immediate danger and the criminal history record
check shows that the applicant meets the criteria specified in section
18-12-203; except that the applicant need not demonstrate competence
with a handgun and the applicant may be eighteen years of age or older.
(b) (I) A temporary emergency permit issued pursuant to this
section is valid for a period of ninety days after the date of issuance. Prior
to or within ten days after expiration of a temporary emergency permit,
the permittee may apply to the sheriff of the county or city and county in
which the person resides or in which the circumstances giving rise to the
emergency exist for renewal of the permit. The sheriff may renew a
temporary emergency permit once for an additional ninety-day period;
except that, if the permittee is younger than twenty-one years of age, the
sheriff may renew the temporary emergency permit for subsequent
ninety-day periods until the permittee reaches twenty-one years of age.
(II) If the sheriff is not the same sheriff who issued the temporary
emergency permit to the permittee:
(A) The permittee shall submit to the renewing sheriff, in addition
to the materials described in section 18-12-205, a legible photocopy of the
temporary emergency permit; and
(B) The renewing sheriff shall contact the office of the sheriff
-10- HB26-1212

who issued the temporary emergency permit and confirm that the issuing
sheriff has not revoked or suspended the temporary emergency permit.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-210, repeal
(3) as follows:
18-12-210. Maintenance of permit - address change - invalidity
of permit.
(3) The provisions of this section apply to temporary emergency
permits issued pursuant to section 18-12-209.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-12-211
as follows:
18-12-211. Renewal of permits.
(1) (a) Within one hundred twenty days prior to expiration of a
permit, the permittee may obtain a renewal form from the sheriff of the
county or city and county in which the permittee resides or from the
sheriff of the county or city and county in which the permittee maintains
a secondary residence or owns or leases real property used by the
permittee in a business and renew the permit by demonstrating
competence with a handgun, as described in subsection (3) of this section,
and submitting to the sheriff a completed renewal form; an affidavit
stating that the permittee remains qualified pursuant to the criteria
specified in section 18-12-203 (1)(a) to (1)(g); and the required renewal
fee not to exceed fifty dollars, as set by the sheriff pursuant to section
18-12-205 (5). The renewal form must meet the requirements specified
in section 18-12-205 (1) for an application.
(b) If the sheriff is not the same sheriff who issued the permit to
the permittee:
(I) The permittee shall submit to the renewing sheriff, in addition
-11- HB26-1212

to the materials described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), a legible
photocopy of the permit; and
(II) The renewing sheriff shall contact the office of the sheriff
who issued the permit and confirm that the issuing sheriff has not revoked
or suspended the permit.
(c) The sheriff shall verify pursuant to section 18-12-205 (4) that
the permittee meets the criteria specified in section 18-12-203 (1)(a) to
(1)(g) and is not a danger as described in section 18-12-203 (2) and shall
either renew or deny the renewal of the permit in accordance with the
provisions of section 18-12-206 (1). If the sheriff denies renewal of a
permit, the permittee may seek a second review of the renewal application
by the sheriff and may submit additional information for the record. The
permittee may also seek judicial review as provided in section 18-12-207.
(2) A permittee who fails to file a renewal form on or before the
permit expiration date may renew the permit by paying a late fee of
fifteen dollars in addition to the renewal fee established pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section. No permit shall be renewed six months or
more after its expiration date, and the permit shall be deemed to have
permanently expired. A person whose permit has permanently expired
may reapply for a permit, but the person shall submit an application for
a permit and the fee required pursuant to section 18-12-205. A person
who knowingly and intentionally files false or misleading information or
deliberately omits material information required under this section is
subject to criminal prosecution for perjury under section 18-8-503.
(3) A permittee seeking renewal pursuant to this section may
demonstrate competence with a handgun by submitting:
(a) Evidence of demonstrating competence with firearms through
-12- HB26-1212

participation in organized shooting competitions, current military service,
or current certification as a peace officer pursuant to article 2.5 of title 16;
(b) Evidence that, at the time the application is submitted, the
applicant is a verified instructor;
(c) Proof of honorable discharge from a branch of the United
States armed forces that reflects pistol qualifications obtained within the
ten years preceding submittal of the renewal form;
(d) A certificate showing retirement from a Colorado law
enforcement agency that reflects pistol qualifications obtained within the
ten years preceding submittal of the renewal form; or
(e) A training certificate that includes the original signature of the
class instructor from a concealed handgun training class or a refresher
class, described in section 18-12-202.5, obtained within six months prior
to submitting a renewal form.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-212, amend
(2) as follows:
18-12-212. Exemption.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of this part 2 to the contrary,
a retired peace officer, level I or Ia, as defined in section 18-1-901
(3)(l)(I) and (3)(l)(II), as said THE section existed prior to its repeal in
2003, within the first five years after retirement may obtain a permit by
submitting to the sheriff of the jurisdiction in which the retired peace
officer resides a letter signed by the sheriff or chief of police of the
jurisdiction by which the peace officer was employed immediately prior
to retirement attesting that the retired officer meets the criteria specified
in section 18-12-203 (1). A retired peace officer who submits a letter
pursuant to this subsection (2) is not subject to the fingerprint or criminal
-13- HB26-1212

history check requirements specified in this part 2 and is not required to
pay the permit application fee. Upon receipt of a letter submitted pursuant
to this subsection (2), the sheriff shall issue the permit. A permit issued
pursuant to this subsection (2) may not be renewed. Upon expiration of
the permit, the permittee may apply for a new permit as provided in this
part 2.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-213, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(a) as follows:
18-12-213. Reciprocity.
(1) A permit to carry a concealed handgun or a concealed weapon
that is issued by a state that recognizes the validity of permits issued
pursuant to this part 2 shall be IS valid in this state in all respects as a
permit issued pursuant to this part 2 if the permit is issued to a person
who is:
(a) Twenty-one EIGHTEEN years of age OLD or older; and
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-214, amend
(1)(a); and repeal (1)(c), (2.5), and (6) as follows:
18-12-214. Authority granted by permit - carrying
restrictions.
(1) (a) A permit to carry a concealed handgun authorizes the
permittee to carry a concealed handgun in all areas of the state, except as
specifically limited in this section. A permit does not authorize the
permittee to use a handgun in a manner that would violate a provision of
state law. A LOCAL GOVERNMENT DOES NOT HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO
ADOPT OR ENFORCE AN ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION THAT CONFLICTS WITH
ANY PROVISION OF THIS PART 2.
(c) (I) A local government, including a special district, or the
-14- HB26-1212

governing board of an institution of higher education, including the board
of directors of the Auraria higher education center, may enact an
ordinance, resolution, rule, or other regulation that prohibits a permittee
from carrying a concealed handgun in a building or specific area within
the local government's or governing board's jurisdiction, or for a special
district, in a building or specific area under the direct control or
management of the district, including a building or facility managed
pursuant to an agreement between the district and a contractor. An
ordinance, resolution, or other regulation prohibiting a permittee from
carrying a concealed handgun may only impose a civil penalty for a
violation and require the person to leave the premises. For a first offense,
the ordinance, resolution, or other regulation may not impose a fine that
exceeds fifty dollars and may not impose a sentence of incarceration. A
person who does not leave the premises when required may be subject to
criminal penalties.
(II) If a local government or governing board prohibits carrying
a concealed handgun in a building or specific area, the local government
or governing board shall post signs at the public entrances to the building
or specific area informing persons that carrying a concealed handgun is
prohibited in the building or specific area. The notice required by this
section may be included on a sign describing open carry restrictions
posted in accordance with section 29-11.7-104.
(2.5) A permit issued pursuant to this part 2 does not authorize a
person to carry a concealed handgun into a place where the carrying of
concealed handguns is prohibited by a local ordinance, resolution, rule,
or other regulation.
(6) The provisions of this section apply to temporary emergency
-15- HB26-1212

permits issued pursuant to section 18-12-209.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 29-11.7-104
as follows:
29-11.7-104. Regulation - carrying - posting.
(1) A local government may enact an ordinance, regulation, or
other law that prohibits the open carrying of a firearm, OTHER THAN A
HANDGUN, in a building or specific area within the local government's
jurisdiction. If a local government enacts an ordinance, regulation, or
other law that prohibits the open carrying of a firearm, OTHER THAN A
HANDGUN, in a building or specific area, the local government shall post
signs at the public entrances to the building or specific area informing
persons that the open carrying of firearms, OTHER THAN HANDGUNS, is
prohibited in the building or specific area.
(2) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT DOES NOT HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO
ENACT AN ORDINANCE, REGULATION, OR OTHER LAW THAT PROHIBITS THE
OPEN CARRYING OF A HANDGUN IN A BUILDING OR SPECIFIC AREA WITHIN
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S JURISDICTION.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-20.5-1206,
amend (3) as follows:
25-20.5-1206. Rules - report.
(3) On or before December 31, 2027, and on or before December
31 every fifth year thereafter, the office shall issue a report to the general
assembly summarizing gun violence prevention measures adopted by
local jurisdictions pursuant to article 11.7 of title 29. or section
18-12-214. The office shall make the report publicly available on its
website or, if the office does not have a dedicated website, on a web page
of the department's website. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I),
-16- HB26-1212

the report required pursuant to this subsection (3) continues indefinitely.
SECTION 22. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-17- HB26-1212